California, session 20252026, SB13.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission monitor foreign countries that export oil to California and identify on its internet website which of those countries have demonstrated human rights abuses, as documented by the United States Department of State, and which of those countries have lower environmental standards for the production of oil than California.SEC. 2. Section 39619.9 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:39619.9. (a) The state board shall annually produce an assessment of the greenhouse gas emissions associated with the transportation of oil in California from the point of origin to its point of destination in California. The assessment shall be made available on the state board’s internet website. The assessment shall include all of the following:(1) An estimate of the greenhouse gas emissions associated with the transportation of oil in this state for oil imported into the state during the previous year broken down by the country of origin.(2) An estimate of the greenhouse gas emissions associated with the transportation of oil in this state for oil produced within the state during the previous year.(3) A description of the methodology and assumptions used to produce the assessment.(4) A citation or link to the data used to produce the assessment.(b) The state board shall post on its internet website a report on the air quality impact of potentially importing 5 percent to 10 percent of the state’s gasoline supply using tanker ships.(b)(c) (1) The State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission shall annually provide data collected pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 25350) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code to the state board for the purposes of the assessment required pursuant to subdivision (a).(2) Data provided to the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) shall comply with applicable confidentiality requirements specified in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 25350) of Division 15 of the Public Resources Code.(3) The commission shall not use any funds from electric ratepayers to implement this subdivision.SEC. 3.Section 3118 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:3118.The division shall provide a link on its internet website to air quality emissions data associated with the transportation of oil imported into the state.SEC. 4.Section 25236 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:25236.(a)The commission shall prominently display on the front page of its internet website both of the following:(1)A report on the air quality impact of potentially importing 5 percent to 10 percent of the state’s gasoline supply using tanker ships.(2)A report describing the refinery storage costs, as determined by the commission.(b)A report produced by the commission estimating gasoline price breakdowns and margins shall include the cost of shipping oil.(c)The commission shall not use any funds from electric ratepayers to implement this section.